Maryland, session 2026, SB0626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
4–208.1.
(A) THE SECRETARY SHALL KEEP AND MAINTAIN A BIRTH INFORMATION
HISTORY FOR EACH INDIVIDUAL FOR WHOM A CERTIFICATE OF BIRTH IS ISSUED
UNDER § 4–208 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) (1) THE BIRTH INFORMATION HISTORY FOR AN INDIVIDUAL SHALL
CONTAIN A HISTORICAL RECORD OF:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL’S BIRTH DATE;
(II) THE INDIVIDUAL’S NAME;
(III) THE INDIVIDUAL’S SEX DESIGNATION AT BIRTH; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REGARDING THE INDIVIDUAL
THE SECRETARY REQUIRES.
(2) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT STANDARD PROCEDURES FOR
ADDING UPDATED INFORMATION TO AN INDIVIDUAL’S BIRTH INFORMATION
HISTORY.
(C) UPDATED BIRTH INFORMATION HISTORY:
(1) IS SEALED;
(2) MAY BE ACCESSED ONLY THROUGH THE PROCESS DESCRIBED
UNDER § 4–211(G) OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT.

SENATE BILL 626 3
4–211.
(a) Except as provided in subsection [(d)] (E) of this section, the Secretary shall
make a new certificate of birth for an individual if the Department receives satisfactory
proof that:
(1) The individual was born in this State; and
(2) Regardless of the location, one of the following has occurred:
(i) The previously unwed parents of the individual have married
each other after the birth of the individual;
(ii) A court of competent jurisdiction has entered an order as to the
parentage, legitimation, or adoption of the individual; or
(iii) If a parent who did not give birth to the individual is not named
on an earlier certificate of birth:
1. The parent who did not give birth to the individual has
acknowledged [himself or herself] by affidavit to [be] BEING a parent of the individual; and
2. The mother [of the individual] OR PARENT LISTED ON
THE INDIVIDUAL’S BIRTH CERTIFICATE has consented by affidavit to the
acknowledgment.
(b) Except as provided in subsection [(d)] (E) of this section, the Secretary shall
make a new certificate of birth for an individual if the Department receives satisfactory
proof that:
(1) The individual was born in this State; and
(2) Regardless of the location, one of the following has occurred:
(i) [1. IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS A MINOR OR DISABLED PERSON
UNDER GUARDIANSHIP:
A. A licensed health care practitioner who has treated or
evaluated the individual has determined that the individual’s sex designation should be
changed because the individual has undergone treatment appropriate for the purpose of
sex transition or has been diagnosed with an intersex condition;
2.] The individual, or if the individual is a minor or disabled
person under guardianship, the individual’s parent, guardian, or legal representative, has
made a written request, UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY, for; AND

SENATE BILL 626
B. THE INDIVIDUAL’S PARENT, GUARDIAN, OR LEGAL
REPRESENTATIVE HAS MADE A WRITTEN REQUEST FOR A NEW CERTIFICATE OF
BIRTH WITH A SEX DESIGNATION THAT DIFFERS FROM THE SEX DESIGNATED ON THE
ORIGINAL CERTIFICATE OF BIRTH; OR
2. IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS NOT A MINOR OR DISABLED
PERSON UNDER GUARDIANSHIP, THE INDIVIDUAL HAS SUBMITTED AN AFFIDAVIT
REQUESTING a new certificate of birth with a sex designation that differs from the sex
designated on the original certificate of birth THAT INCLUDED AN ATTESTATION UNDER
PENALTY OF PERJURY THAT THE REQUEST IS NOT BEING SUBMITTED FOR A
FRAUDULENT OR UNLAWFUL PURPOSE; [and
3. The licensed health care practitioner has signed a
statement, under penalty of perjury, that:
A. The individual has undergone surgical, hormonal, or other
treatment appropriate for the individual, based on generally accepted medical standards;
or
B. The individual has an intersex condition and, in the
professional opinion of the licensed health care practitioner, based on generally accepted
medical standards, the individual’s sex designation should be changed accordingly;]
(ii) A court of competent jurisdiction has issued an order indicating
that the sex of an individual born in this State has been changed; or
(iii) Before October 1, 2015, the Secretary, as provided under
regulations adopted by the Department, amended an original certificate of birth on receipt
of a certified copy of an order of a court of competent jurisdiction indicating the sex of the
individual had been changed.
(c) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, THE
SECRETARY SHALL MAKE A NEW CERTIFICATE OF BIRTH FOR AN INDIVIDUAL IF THE
DEPARTMENT RECEIVES SATISFACTORY PROOF THAT:
(1) THE INDIVIDUAL WAS BORN IN THIS STATE; AND
(2) REGARDLESS OF THE LOCATION, A COURT OF COMPETENT
JURISDICTION HAS ISSUED AN ORDER INDICATING THAT THE NAME OF A PARENT
LISTED ON THE CERTIFICATE OF BIRTH HAS BEEN CHANGED.
(D) Except as provided in subsection [(d)] (E) of this section, the Secretary may
make a new certificate of birth for an individual who was born outside the United States if
one of the following occurred in this State:

SENATE BILL 626 5
(1) The previously unwed parents of the individual have married each
other after the birth of the individual;
(2) A court of competent jurisdiction in this State has entered an order as
to parentage or legitimation; or
(3) The parent who did not give birth to the individual acknowledged
[himself or herself] by affidavit to [be] BEING a parent of the individual and the mother
OR PARENT LISTED ON THE BIRTH CERTIFICATE of the individual has consented by
affidavit to the acknowledgment.
[(d)] (E) The Secretary may not make a new certificate of birth in connection
with an order of a court of competent jurisdiction relating to the adoption of an individual,
if one of the following so directs the Secretary:
(1) The court that decrees the adoption;
(2) The adoptive parents; or
(3) The adopted individual, if an adult.
[(e)] (F) A new certificate of birth shall be prepared on the following basis:
(1) The individual shall be treated as having at birth the status that later
is acquired or established and of which proof is submitted.
(2) (i) If the parents of the individual were not married and parentage
is established by legal proceedings, the name of the parent who did not give birth to the
individual shall be inserted.
(ii) The legal proceeding should request and report to the Secretary
that the surname of the subject of the record be changed from that shown on the original
certificate, if a change is desired.
(3) If the individual is adopted, the name of the individual shall be that set
by the decree of adoption, and the adoptive parents shall be recorded as the parents of the
individual.
(4) The new certificate of birth shall contain wording that requires each
parent shown on the new certificate to indicate [his or her] THE PARENT’S own Social
Security number.
[(f)] (G) (1) When a new certificate of birth is made under subsection (b) of
this section:

SENATE BILL 626
(i) The sex designation of the individual on the new certificate of
birth shall be the sex designation for which satisfactory proof has been submitted in
accordance with subsection (b) of this section; and
(ii) If the name of the individual has been changed at any time, the
name of the individual on the new certificate of birth shall be the name that was last
established and for which appropriate documentation has been submitted to the
Department.
(2) A new certificate of birth made under subsection (b) of this section may
not:
(i) Be marked “amended”; or
(ii) Show on its face that a change has been made to:
1. A sex designation; or
2. If applicable, a change of name.
(3) (I) WHEN ISSUING A NEW CERTIFICATE OF BIRTH UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL ALLOW AN INDIVIDUAL
TO DESIGNATE THE SEX OF THE INDIVIDUAL AS:
1. FEMALE;
2. MALE; OR
3. UNSPECIFIED OR ANOTHER.
(II) IF AN INDIVIDUAL INDICATES A SEX DESIGNATION OF
UNSPECIFIED OR ANOTHER ON AN APPLICATION FOR A NEW CERTIFICATE OF BIRTH,
THE SECRETARY SHALL ENSURE THAT THE NEW CERTIFICATE OF BIRTH DISPLAYS
AN “X” IN THE LOCATION THAT INDICATES THE INDIVIDUAL’S SEX.
(H) (1) WHEN A NEW CERTIFICATE OF BIRTH IS MADE UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, IF THE NAME OF THE PARENT HAS BEEN
CHANGED AT ANY TIME:
(I) THE NAME OF THE PARENT ON THE NEW CERTIFICATE OF
BIRTH SHALL BE THE NAME THAT WAS LAST ESTABLISHED AND FOR WHICH
APPROPRIATE DOCUMENTATION HAS BEEN SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(II) EXCEPT ON REQUEST OF THE INDIVIDUAL, OR, IF THE
INDIVIDUAL IS A MINOR OR DISABLED PERSON UNDER GUARDIANSHIP, THE

SENATE BILL 626 7
INDIVIDUAL’S PARENT, GUARDIAN, OR LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE, THE NEW
CERTIFICATE OF BIRTH MAY NOT INCLUDE ANY PRIOR LEGAL NAME OF THE PARENT.
(2) A NEW CERTIFICATE OF BIRTH MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION MAY NOT:
(I) BE MARKED “AMENDED”; OR
(II) SHOW ON ITS FACE THAT A CHANGE HAS BEEN MADE TO:
1. A SEX DESIGNATION; OR
2. IF APPLICABLE, A NAME.
[(g)] (I) (1) If a new certificate of birth is made, the Secretary shall:
(i) Substitute the new certificate of birth for any certificate then on
file; and
(ii) Place the original certificate of birth and all records that relate
to the new certificate of birth under seal.
(2) The seal may be broken only:
(i) On order of a court of competent jurisdiction;
(ii) If it does not violate the confidentiality of the record, on written
order of a designee of the Secretary; or
(iii) In accordance with Title 5, Subtitle 3A or Subtitle 4B of the
Family Law Article.
(3) A certified copy of the certificate of birth that later is issued shall be a
copy of the new certificate of birth, unless:
(i) A court of competent jurisdiction orders the issuance of a copy of
the original certificate of birth; or
(ii) Title 5, Subtitle 3A or Subtitle 4B of the Family Law Article
provides for the issuance of a copy of the original certificate of birth.
[(h)] (J) Each clerk of court shall send to the Secretary, on the form that the
Secretary provides, a report of:
(1) Each decree of adoption;

SENATE BILL 626
(2) Each adjudication of parentage, including the parent’s Social Security
number; and
(3) Each revocation or amendment of any decree of adoption or
adjudication of paternity that the court enters.
[(i)] (K) Upon receipt of a report or decree of annulment of adoption, the original
certificate of birth shall be restored to its place in the files, and the adoption certificate and
any accompanying documents are not subject to inspection except upon order of a court of
competent jurisdiction or as provided by regulation.
[(j)] (L) If no certificate of birth is on file for the person for whom a new birth
certificate is to be established under this section, and the date and place of birth have not
been determined in the adoption or paternity proceedings:
(1) A delayed certificate of birth shall be filed with the Secretary as
provided in § 4–210 of this subtitle before a new certificate of birth is established; and
(2) The new birth certificate shall be prepared on the delayed birth
certificate form.
[(k)] (M) (1) The Secretary shall, on request, prepare and register a certificate
in this State for an individual born in a foreign country and who was adopted:
(i) Through a court of competent jurisdiction in this State; or
(ii) 1. Under the laws of a jurisdiction or country other than the
United States and has been granted an IR–3 or IH–3 visa by the U.S. Citizenship and
Immigration Services under the Immigration and Nationality Act; and
2. By an adopting parent who is a resident of this State.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the certificate
shall be established on receipt of:
(i) A certificate of adoption from the court decreeing the adoption;
(ii) Proof of the date and place of the child’s birth; and
(iii) A request from the court, the adopting parents, or the adopted
person if 18 years of age or over that the certificate be prepared.
(3) If the child was adopted under the laws of a jurisdiction or country other
than the United States and has been granted an IR–3 or IH–3 visa by the U.S. Citizenship
and Immigration Services under the Immigration and Nationality Act, the certificate shall
be established on receipt of:

SENATE BILL 626 9
(i) An official copy of the decree from the jurisdiction or country in
which the child was adopted;
(ii) A certified translation of the foreign adoption decree;
(iii) Proof of the date and place of the child’s birth;
(iv) Proof of IR–3 or IH–3 visa status;
(v) A request from the court, the adopting parents, or the adopted
person if 18 years of age or over that the certificate be prepared; and
(vi) Proof that the adopting parent is a resident of this State.
(4) The certificate shall be labeled “Certificate of Foreign Birth” and shall
show the actual country of birth.
(5) A statement shall also be included on the certificate indicating that it
is not evidence of United States citizenship for the child for whom it is issued.
Article – Transportation
12–305.
(a) An application for a license, an identification card, or a moped operator’s
permit shall allow an applicant to indicate that the sex the applicant identifies as is:
(1) Female;
(2) Male; or
(3) Unspecified or [other] ANOTHER.
(b) The Administration shall ensure that the license, identification card, or moped
operator’s permit of an applicant who has indicated an unspecified or [other] ANOTHER
sex on an application displays an “X” in the location on the license, identification card, or
moped operator’s permit that indicates the applicant’s sex.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.